Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-1465
Warranty audits.

(1) A warrantor may conduct a warranty audit of any dealer that requests warranty compensation from the warrantor.

(2) A warrantor may conduct such warranty audits for any number of such dealers, but not more often for each such dealer than three months since the last warranty audit conducted by such warrantor.

Laws 2026, LB972, § 24.
October 1, 2026